Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.465

Nonapplicability of RCW 32.32.450.

Unless made applicable by the director by prior advice in writing, the prohibition contained in RCW 32.32.450 shall not apply to any offer or announcement of an offer which if consummated would result in acquisition by a person, together with all other acquisitions by the person of the same class of securities during the preceding twelve-month period, of not more than one percent of the same class of securities.

[ 1994 c 92 s 398; 1981 c 85 s 92.]